Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-524.01
Wild pigs; animals of the Families Tayassuidae and Suidae; prohibited acts; destruction; when; penalty.

(1) It shall be illegal to knowingly engage in, sponsor, instigate, assist, or profit from the release, killing, wounding, or attempted killing or wounding of animals of the Families Tayassuidae and Suidae for the purpose of sport, pleasure, amusement, or production of a trophy. The commission shall destroy any feral swine and may authorize any agents, including landowners, to destroy and dispose of any feral swine.

(2) For purposes of this section, feral swine means swine whose reversion from the domesticated state to a wild state is apparent or an otherwise freely roaming swine having no visible tags, marking, or characteristics indicating that it is from a domestic herd, and reasonable inquiry within the area does not identify an owner.

(3) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 19;

Laws 2005, LB 20, § 1.